Missouri, session 2026, HB20.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 20.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For distributions to private institutions of higher education for MoExcels
Workforce Development Initiatives recommended by the
Coordinating Board for Higher Education, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the
recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$3,026,580

SCS HCS HB 20 2
Section 20.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the purpose of planning and implementing technology updates for
Missouri’s job centers providing statewide services to citizens
and employers and to provide adaptive technology to service
citizens with disabilities and allow for improved virtual delivery
of services
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................................$634
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 195,535
Total ..............................................................................................................................$196,169
Section 20.013. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For grants to port authorities, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$10,989,831
Section 20.014. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For grants to a port authority located in any county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand but fewer than three thousand inhabitants, provided that
local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$2,899,395
Section 20.016. To the Department of Transportation
For the design and environmental study phases for a not-for-profit
organization formed for the purpose of managing, operating, and
maintaining the streetcar as well as planning for future streetcar
extensions located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,000,000

SCS HCS HB 20 3
Section 20.017. To the Department of Transportation
For multimodal infrastructure improvements for a public port authority
in excess of 100 acres located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$28,441,511
For the construction, renovations, and improvements for a public port
authority located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 6,824,024
Total .........................................................................................................................$35,265,535
Section 20.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For completing HVAC projects for various state department facilities
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$12,952,081
Section 20.030. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For the purpose of planning and implementing technology updates for
the Department of Commerce and Insurance’s e-Licensing
system
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$3,249,917
Section 20.031. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a new state office building located in any
city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants, and located in a county with more
than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants, and
with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand six hundred inhabitants

SCS HCS HB 20 4
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$5,630,531
Section 20.032. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a fleet management office building and
fleet garage in any county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,601,500
Section 20.033. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a new statewide warehouse in any county
with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,009,104
Section 20.037. To the Office of Administration
For the expansion of a sports training facility of a nonprofit organization
for athletes with special needs in a city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,000,000
Section 20.039. To the Office of Administration
For the construction and programming costs for an early childhood
career education program in a county with a population of over
thirty-one thousand but no more than thirty-five thousand, with a
county seat of a population over ten thousand but no more than
thirteen thousand, provided that a local match of ten percent be
provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 20.046. To the Lieutenant Governor
For agri-tourism road sign cost-share grants, provided that no local match
be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 20.055. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development

SCS HCS HB 20 5
For broadband cellular towers, with priority to underserved and unserved
locations
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$19,805,056
Section 20.065. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For community development and revitalization, provided that local
match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$78,572,550
Section 20.070. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For grants to political subdivisions, including but not limited to levee
districts, for an Industrial Site Development Program, provided
that local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
For projects one thousand (1,000) or more contiguous acres in size
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$25,723,152
For projects under one thousand (1,000) contiguous acres in size
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 18,892,672
Total .........................................................................................................................$44,615,824
Section 20.090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For workforce development
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$20,913,634
Section 20.100. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For local tourism development, provided that any grant awards disbursed
from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis
provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient or
local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic

SCS HCS HB 20 6
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$22,162,393
Section 20.110. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For renovations, HVAC upgrades, dietary upgrades, construction, and
replacements at the St. James Veterans’ Home
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,878,579
Section 20.111. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For planning, design, construction, renovations, and upgrades at the Cape
Girardeau Veterans’ Home
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$11,956,647
Section 20.115. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For compiling, standardizing, and maintaining Geographic Information
System (GIS) data in support of the statewide implementation of
Next Generation 911 (NG911) and enhancements, provided that
local matching funds must be provided on a 90/10 state/local
basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$13,088,481
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 5,511,836
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,600,317
Section 20.120. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a sub-system addition to the Missouri Statewide Interoperability
Network (MOSWIN), increasing user capacity and portable radio
communication coverage throughout Jefferson City, and
extending into Cole and Callaway Counties
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$1,573,268
Section 20.125. To the Office of Administration
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For expenses of any state agency responding to COVID-19
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic

SCS HCS HB 20 7
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$20,000,000
Section 20.135. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the planning, design, construction, and equipping of a crime
laboratory as part of a multi-agency laboratory campus including
building space, laboratory space, fixtures, equipment, systems
furniture, and parking infrastructure
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$96,981,009
Section 20.150. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For grants to emergency medical providers, fire protection entities, or
public safety officers, provided that local matching funds must be
provided
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$16,862,570
Section 20.151. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For grants to local county law enforcement and local county prosecutors
in counties with a high percentage of alleged sexual crimes
against children
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$286,443
Section 20.165. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For design, renovation, construction, and improvements to become
compliant with Americans with Disabilities Act standards in
cottages and group homes
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$6,778,085
Section 20.176. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health

SCS HCS HB 20 8
For the renovation and accessibility for housing and care for HIV/AIDS
patients in a city not within a county, provided that local
matching must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$757,180
Section 20.185. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For grants to federally qualified health centers, certified community
behavioral health organizations, and community mental health
centers, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 60/40 state/local basis for
projects under five million dollars ($5,000,000) and a 50/50 basis
by the recipient for projects over five million dollars ($5,000,000)
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$77,220,675
Section 20.187. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For grants to a federally qualified health center founded in 1972,
improving the health and quality of life for all residents in any
city not within a county, for repair and renovation, provided that
local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ...........................................................................................$10,727
Section 20.197. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the upgrades to outdated MRI & Ultrasound equipment in a hospital
in a city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be provided
on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,250,000
Section 20.198. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services

SCS HCS HB 20 9
For surgical equipment for the hospital located in a county with more
than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than three thousand six hundred but fewer than four
thousand two hundred ten inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 20.199. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For grants to ambulance services, for equipment, radios, or training,
provided that the maximum award shall be $100,000 per
recipient, and further provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 90/10 state/local basis; and for a statewide
communications and patient movement platform
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$9,500,000
Section 20.205. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For providers of Medicaid services in rural counties for the purchase of
necessary equipment and training for the purpose of increasing
access to telehealth services for MO HealthNet participants
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$6,666,803
Section 20.212. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an emergency
medical services helipad and ambulance base for a hospital in any
county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$2,910,270
Section 20.215. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development

SCS HCS HB 20 10
To Missouri State University – West Plains
For completion and operational costs of an autism center
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$1,025,611
Section 20.216. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
To the University of Missouri
For construction and sitework of a center for autism and
neurodevelopmental disorders that provides clinical services,
research, and training, provided that no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$25,846,013
Section 20.218. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For Cape Girardeau Career and Technology Center, for equipment and
structural improvements, provided that any grant awards
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$934,065
Section 20.219. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For an organization domiciled in any city with more than forty thousand
but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants, and partially
located in a county with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, that provides year-round sports
training and athletic competition for children and adults with
intellectual and developmental disabilities, to support the
ongoing mission of building confidence and better the lives of
those with intellectual and developmental disabilities, provided
that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 20.224. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the construction and/or renovation of a childcare facility specializing
in children of public safety workers in a county with more than

SCS HCS HB 20 11
one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,500,000
Section 20.300. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For investments in waste water improvements, including costs related to
the connection of statewide facilities to municipal sewer systems
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$6,689,486
Section 20.310. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For a covered arena and stormwater projects at the Missouri State
Fairgrounds
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ...........................................................................................................$30,481,868
Section 20.314. To the Department of Agriculture
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new maintenance building at the Missouri State Fair
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,866,500
Section 20.315. To the Department of Agriculture
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
an arena at the Missouri State Fair
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$24,773,165
Section 20.325. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and lead service-line inventories,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
Personal Service .......................................................................................................$102
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 364,847,819
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................$364,847,921

SCS HCS HB 20 12
Section 20.326. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the testing, filtration, and remediation of lead in drinking water
sources within buildings housing early childhood, elementary,
and secondary education programs which receive state funding
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$26,013,540
Section 20.330. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For state park and historic site water and wastewater improvements
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ...........................................................................................................$38,182,448
Section 20.335. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Hydrology Information Center
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$4,825
Personal Service ..................................................................................................482,537
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,570,508
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ....................................................................................................... 9,053,045
Total (Not to exceed 4.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$9,057,870
Section 20.336. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repair, and capital improvements for sewer updates for
a nursing facility located in any county with more than six
thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than four hundred but fewer than one
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$116,205
Section 20.360. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Conservation
For levee setback and road relocation at Columbia Bottom Conservation
Area

SCS HCS HB 20 13
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ........................................................$11,777,808
Section 20.361. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than forty-six
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local
basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 20.362. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than one hundred twenty
thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 20.363. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than fifty-one
thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$5,000,000
Section 20.364. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water and wastewater infrastructure projects in any city with more
than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local
basis

SCS HCS HB 20 14
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$1,937,000
Section 20.370. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband infrastructure
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) ......................$18,265,105
From Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund (2431) ................................................. 132,196,859
Total .......................................................................................................................$150,461,964
Section 20.371. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For reimbursement to broadband providers, for certain costs incurred for
state broadband projects to remove, install, or replace utility
poles, where such costs are necessary to extend the provider’s
retail broadband services offering speeds of 100/100 Mbps to an
area currently lacking broadband speeds of 25/3 Mbps, excluding
providers that have a pre-existing and enforceable federal or state
funding commitment for the same location, provided fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 20.370
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) ......................$14,847,955
Section 20.375. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband capacity building
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$10,208
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,020,808
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,629,159
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) .................. 6,649,967
Total (Not to exceed 13.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,660,175
Section 20.376. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design and construction of a parking garage located in
a city with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,000,000

SCS HCS HB 20 15
Section 20.378. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design and construction of a community facility located
in a city with more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer
than two thousand one hundred fifty inhabitants and located in a
county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than
twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer than two
thousand three hundred inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 20.379. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the upgrades and renovations to a theater that is located in a village
with more than fifty-two but fewer than sixty-one inhabitants and
located in a county with more than twenty-two thousand but
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
sixteen thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$150,000
Section 20.381. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For an entertainment district working towards stimulating the growth,
community spirit and entertainment of the district located in any
city with more than four thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county, while promoting the historic character, provided
that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.390. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety and the Department of the National
Guard
For planning, design, construction and capital improvements to replace
water and sanitation lines, connections to municipal wastewater
treatment facilities, and establishing water and wastewater
service
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$4,767,520

SCS HCS HB 20 16
Section 20.400. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for the installation of additional broadband
capacity within state correctional centers
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) ........................$3,535,249
Section 20.405. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, wastewater
systems, and storm water systems at facilities statewide
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$5,089,100
Section 20.500. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For distributions to providers of vocational education programs,
provided that twenty-five percent (25%) local matching funds be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$9,312,289
Section 20.505. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For agriculture innovation and workforce program grants to higher
education institutions
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$6,082,315
Section 20.506. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For capital improvements to a facility housing an organization in a city
not within a county which facilitates supplemental education
programs including education, job development and training, and
community service programs to under-resourced individuals
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$977,304

SCS HCS HB 20 17
Section 20.508. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-Columbia for construction, renovation,
and maintenance and repair needs for NextGen
Radiopharmaceuticals, Animal Science, Healthcare,
Engineering, Student Success and directly related academic
assets and infrastructure including related planning, design,
demolition, acquisitions, project management, equipment, and
start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,000,000
Section 20.510. To the Office of Administration
For digital government transformation of the State of Missouri
information technology systems, provided that not more than
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility in F.T.E. is allowed from
this section to Section 5.030 of House Bill No. 2005, as truly
agreed to and finally passed by the 102nd General Assembly,
Second Regular Session
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$79,088
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,908,847
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,200,405
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 23,109,252
Total (Not to exceed 30.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$23,188,340
Section 20.520. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the purpose of replacing the Missouri Department of Agriculture’s
Grain Regulatory Services licensing system
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$144,146
Section 20.525. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the purpose of modernizing the Missouri Department of Social
Services’ Missouri Automated Child Support System

SCS HCS HB 20 18
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$14,660
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,465,984
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,218,249
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 17,684,233
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$17,698,893
Section 20.560. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For build-out of the Public Safety Broadband Network (PSBN) in
Jefferson City to increase wireless broadband coverage and
capacity in and around the buildings of the Capitol Complex
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$7,513,716
Section 20.570. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For an additional zone controller in order to reduce load and increase
capacity of the Missouri Statewide Interoperability Network
(MOSWIN)
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,642,709
Section 20.572. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For funding of training on proper use-of-force, de-escalation, and
constitutional policing provided by a basic training center or a
continuing law enforcement education training provider licensed
by the Director of Public Safety. Such training shall be made
available to all Missouri law enforcement officers
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.576. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Department of Public Safety
For the planning, design, and construction of an Aviation Classification
Repair Activity Depot (AVCRAD) aircraft maintenance hangar

SCS HCS HB 20 19
addition at an AVCRAD Base in any city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local match be required
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................$3,800,000
Section 20.580. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, and improvements to institutional
security cameras, camera systems, and associated hardware and
software
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$4,060,729
Section 20.585. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, and improvements to institutional
radios, radio systems, and associated hardware and software
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$455,635
Section 20.600. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
To procure and implement a multi-year, vendor-hosted,
integrated commercial off the shelf electronic health record
system for use in all of the department’s hospitals and facilities
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$15,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 8,425,762
Total .........................................................................................................................$23,425,762
Section 20.601. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the construction of four new Behavioral Health Crisis Centers in
areas of need as determined by the Department of Mental Health
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,717,056

SCS HCS HB 20 20
Section 20.602. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the development, start-up, and furnishing costs for residential
alternatives for the complex, high-need mentally ill/intellectually
disabled population
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,371,169
Section 20.603. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design and construction of an inpatient children’s acute
psychiatric hospital located at a residential treatment facility in a
county with more than one million inhabitants operated by a non-
profit entity that currently operates or is part of a health system
that operates acute/inpatient children’s psychiatric hospitals and
psychiatric residential treatment facilities with extensive
experience in trauma-informed care and adapting the latest
neuroscience to treatment, offering youth full medical,
psychiatric, clinical, and educational services, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$9,500,000
Section 20.604. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For distribution to a nonprofit organization, established prior to 1979,
that serves individuals with developmental disabilities in a city
with more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county, for the
planning, design, and construction of a building to provide adult
daycare programs and services as well as administrative offices,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,500,000
Section 20.605. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction of a healthcare facility to
expend new and innovative healthcare to seniors in a city with
more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two

SCS HCS HB 20 21
hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 40/60 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 20.606. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For distribution to a nonprofit organization with capacity to shelter at
least 140 individuals in a city with more than one hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, for
design, planning, and construction of buildings to provide
housing and workforce training for the homeless, including but
not limited to recently released inmates of the Missouri
Department of Corrections, and office space for administration
and delivery of wrap‑around services related thereto, provided
that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$11,000,000
Section 20.610. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the design and construction of a multi-agency health laboratory
campus, including additional building space, laboratory space,
fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and parking
infrastructure, provided no funds shall be expended to the World
Health Organization
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$70,537,418
Section 20.611. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a grant to an alliance based in a county with more than two hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
comprised of a public university, technical college, school
district, and hospital with a nursing college to support the
integration of educating and training healthcare workers in the
region and developing a pipeline of healthcare professionals
beginning in public secondary schools
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$15,000,000

SCS HCS HB 20 22
Section 20.612. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the construction of a warehouse facility to a residential treatment
center facilitating youth to independent living in a city with more
than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$635,000
Section 20.613. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the improvements to a health care center in city with more than four
thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand
five hundred fifty but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
inhabitants provided that local matching funds must be provided
on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.625. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the development of a case management system
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$5,455,549
Section 20.630. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For grants to organizations for services and programs to assist victims of
crime, provided that such funds shall be awarded through a
competitive grant process
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$181,168
Section 20.643. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For capital improvement projects at a justice center located in a city with
more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county, provided that

SCS HCS HB 20 23
any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be
matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$977,000
Section 20.645. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For capital improvement projects at an airport located in a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand three hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
shall be matched on a 90/10 basis by the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.646. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For capital improvement projects for a nonprofit organization dedicated
to collecting and preserving history, including the preservation of
an historic courthouse in any county with more than twenty-two
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five hundred but fewer than
nine hundred inhabitants, provided that local match be provided
in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................................$2,212
Section 20.648. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems, and storm water systems located in any city with more
than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand
nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three thousand
but fewer than four thousand five hundred fifty inhabitants,
provided that no local match be required

SCS HCS HB 20 24
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,845,336
Section 20.650. To the Office of Administration
For the Supreme Court
For funding court improvement projects
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,845,766
Section 20.705. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For East Central College for the construction and/or renovation needs for
a Rolla Campus including related planning, design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,250,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 4,574,368
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,824,368
Section 20.710. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Jefferson College for the construction and/or renovation needs for
the Arnold Campus including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$125,082
Section 20.715. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Metropolitan Community College for the construction and/or
renovation needs for district wide workforce programming
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 4,724,031
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,724,031
Section 20.720. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development

SCS HCS HB 20 25
For Mineral Area College for the construction and/or renovation needs
for a Center for Excellence including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$323,095
Section 20.725. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Moberly Area Community College for a Next Century Networking
project across the five-campus system to include the construction
and/or renovation needs for the network including related
planning, design, acquisitions, project management, equipment,
and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$744,574
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 1,718,744
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,463,318
Section 20.732. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For expansion to the heavy equipment trade program at a State Tech
College of Missouri
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$14,641,698
Section 20.736. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Ozarks Technical Community College
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a Center for Workforce
and Student Success, including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$39,105,106
Section 20.740. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For St. Charles Community College for the construction and/or
renovation needs for a workforce technical innovation and
transformation campus including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic

SCS HCS HB 20 26
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 10,982,785
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,982,785
Section 20.746. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For St. Louis Community College
For construction and/or renovation needs for education and workforce
training programs for the Wildwood Campus expansion,
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,942,058
Section 20.755. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Three Rivers College for the acquisition and improvement of land
and construction and/or renovation needs for technical education
expansions including related planning, design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$609,221
Section 20.760. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For State Technical College of Missouri for the construction and/or
renovation needs for multiple technical programs for overall
student capacity expansions including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 17,053,302
Total .........................................................................................................................$27,053,302
Section 20.765. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For University of Central Missouri for the deferred maintenance,
construction and/or renovation needs for the Humphreys
Building including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,950,000

SCS HCS HB 20 27
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 24,161,581
Total .........................................................................................................................$34,111,581
Section 20.770. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Southeast Missouri State University for the demolition, construction,
and/or renovation needs for a dual role, multi-use, multi-facility
comprehensive development including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, fixtures, equipment, systems
furniture, and start-up costs, provided that any grant awards
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis by the recipient for project costs up to sixty million
($60,000,000); and further provided project costs over sixty
million ($60,000,000) shall be matched on a 25/75 basis by the
recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$942,008
Section 20.771. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Southeast Missouri State University
For the demolition, construction, and/or renovation needs for a dual-role,
multi-use, multi-facility comprehensive development, including
related planning, design, acquisitions, project management,
fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and start-up costs for a
Modern Campus Health Sciences Building
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$37,000,000
Section 20.775. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri State University for the construction and/or renovation
needs for a Center for Transformational Education for Life,
Physical, and Health Sciences including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,978,769
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic

SCS HCS HB 20 28
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 16,244,854
Total .........................................................................................................................$32,223,623
Section 20.776. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri State University for the demolition, construction and/or
renovation needs for the Judith Enyeart Reynolds Complex,
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,454,188
Section 20.780. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Lincoln University for the construction and/or renovation needs for
health sciences and crisis center including related planning,
design, acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-
up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 28,448,835
Total .........................................................................................................................$38,448,835
Section 20.785. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Truman State University for the demolition of McKinney Center and
the construction and/or renovation needs for the Kirk Student
Access and Success Center including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$6,167,121
Section 20.786. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Truman State University for multi-location HVAC system
improvements including related planning, design, project
management, equipment, and construction costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,755,325

SCS HCS HB 20 29
Section 20.790. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Northwest Missouri State University for the construction and/or
renovation needs for Martindale Hall and related health and allied
sciences education program expansions and campus renovations
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis by the recipient for project costs up to sixty
million ($60,000,000); and further provided project costs over
sixty million ($60,000,000) shall be matched on a 25/75 basis by
the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$6,379,391
Section 20.791. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Northwest Missouri State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for an Energy Infrastructure
Modernization project including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$47,066,811
Section 20.795. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri Southern State University for the construction and/or
renovation needs for the Health Science Innovation Center
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,500,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 18,870,334
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,370,334
Section 20.801. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri Western State University for construction and/or
renovation needs for the student success hub at the Hearnes

SCS HCS HB 20 30
Center including related planning, design, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,807,928
Section 20.805. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Harris-Stowe State University for the construction and/or renovation
needs for a STEM Academic Building including related planning,
design, acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-
up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,750,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 20,109,579
Total .........................................................................................................................$27,859,579
Section 20.820. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri University of Science and Technology for the construction
and/or renovation needs for Missouri Protoplex including related
planning, design, acquisitions, project management, equipment
and start-up costs, provided that any grant awards disbursed from
this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the
recipient for project costs up to sixty million ($60,000,000); and
further provided project costs over sixty million ($60,000,000)
shall be matched on a 25/75 basis by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$35,822,286
Section 20.821. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri for the construction and/or renovation of
an Advancing Missouri’s STEM Education and Workforce
Development, including related planning, design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment, and start-up costs located at the
Missouri University of Science and Technology
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$46,674,811
Section 20.822. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development

SCS HCS HB 20 31
For the planning, design, and construction of an engineering building
at the University of Missouri - St. Louis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$15,000,000
Section 20.825. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-Kansas City for the construction and/or
renovation needs for a Health Sciences District Development
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$40,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 39,567,231
Total .........................................................................................................................$79,567,231
Section 20.830. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-St. Louis for the demolition, construction
and/or renovation needs for a Campus of the Future through a
multi-facility comprehensive effort including related planning,
design, acquisitions, project management, equipment and start-
up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$40,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 17,511,852
Total .........................................................................................................................$57,511,852
Section 20.831. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit organization for design, planning, and construction to
provide a domestic shelter in a city with more than ten thousand
but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and that is the county
seat of a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$228,314
Section 20.833. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety

SCS HCS HB 20 32
For providing a matching grant to a county with more than one million
inhabitants to establish a regional intelligence and information
center, a property control facility, and a training facility and range
for law enforcement, provided that any grant award disbursed
from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis
provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient or
local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$19,696,663
Section 20.834. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture and Small Business Development Authority, for
biofuel infrastructure projects
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$4,984,513
Section 20.835. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For improvements at a historic train station located in a city with more
than twenty-seven thousand but fewer than thirty thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,291,330
Section 20.836. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For the acquisition, construction, maintenance, repair and/or renovation
of a building to provide advanced workforce development for a
school district located in any city with more than four thousand
four hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one hundred
thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants for a technical school, provided that
no local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds

SCS HCS HB 20 33
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$34,728,425
Section 20.840. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the construction of a building that will provide a regional training
facility for law enforcement and fire department personnel,
located in any city with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand but fewer than three thousand
six hundred inhabitants, provided no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,881,000
Section 20.841. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For airport repairs and improvements, located in any city with more than
three thousand but fewer than three thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$686,500
Section 20.843. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction for a library
located in any city with more than six thousand three hundred but
fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than two
hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$58,265

SCS HCS HB 20 34
Section 20.844. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For a local government for the clean-up and preparation for development
for a site comprising over one hundred and forty (140) acres
which has been abandoned for at least ten years in a county with
more than one million inhabitants, provided that any grant awards
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient
or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$1,785,500
Section 20.846. To the Department of Economic Development
For a nonprofit organization located in any county with more than eight
thousand but fewer than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than three hundred but fewer
than six hundred inhabitants that teaches discipline and teamwork
while striving for excellence to youth, for the planning, design,
acquisition, and construction of a sports facility, provided that no
local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$315,577
Section 20.847. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
To the University of Missouri
For equipment and facilities for the Missouri Foundation Seed program,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$1,240,873
Section 20.848. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an agency that
connects job seekers to training programs and employment,
helping employers diversify their workforce, and assisting youth
with career skills located in any county with more than one
million inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds

SCS HCS HB 20 35
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$3,949,256
Section 20.849. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an Amtrak
Station located in any city with more than three thousand four
hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand three hundred but fewer than
five thousand inhabitants, provided no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$965,474
Section 20.852. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the maintenance and improvements of a park and sports complex
located on approximately one hundred twenty-seven acres in any
city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$11,413,215
Section 20.853. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For maintenance and improvements of a library district that serves any
county with more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
three hundred thousand inhabitants and any city with more than
one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$4,966,254
Section 20.854. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor

SCS HCS HB 20 36
For the restoration of a historic library in a city with more than seven
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and that is the
county seat of a county with more than fifteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$100,000
Section 20.855. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of a nonprofit
social services agency located in any city with more than one
hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants that assists residents who are experiencing
hardships by providing resources for basic and emergency needs
in aide to overcome hardships and maintain self-sufficiency,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$5,050,944
Section 20.857. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the purpose of removing condemned city-owned, vacant properties
in any city not within a county, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$14,328,259
Section 20.858. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the purpose of ADA compliant renovations and improvements to a
building located in any city not within a county, that fosters
innovation in place-based neighborhood businesses, offers co-
working space and a neighborhood talent pool, provided that
local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$23,686

SCS HCS HB 20 37
Section 20.859. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the renovation or construction of a facility gifted to a nonprofit
agency that provides therapeutic recovery services to survivors
of child sex trafficking, located in any county with more than two
hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,563,561
Section 20.862. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For capital improvements and workforce development needs for a
nonprofit membership organization serving business in the south
of any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$23,183
Section 20.864. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For maintenance and improvements for county jails, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the
recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$6,795,537
Section 20.865. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the purchase of services, equipment, or supplies for a nonprofit
organization located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county to help
reduce community victimization and strengthen police services
through violence reduction strategies and provided that a local
match, to include personnel costs associated with project
initiatives, to be provided in order to be eligible for state funds

SCS HCS HB 20 38
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 4,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,000,000
Section 20.867. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the purpose of a non-profit organization to acquire a building that
will provide housing units to a center that works to end
homelessness in any county with more than one million
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$91,000
Section 20.873. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For maintenance, repairs, expansion and improvements for the official
Korean War veteran’s memorial located in any city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$561,604
Section 20.874. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction for a library
located in any city with more than eighteen thousand but fewer
than twenty thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three
hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$4,500,000
Section 20.876. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services

SCS HCS HB 20 39
For a nonprofit organization that provides summer food programs, food
pantry and safe houses for men and women who are victims of
abuse located in any city with more than eighteen thousand but
fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one million inhabitants, provided that local match
be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .......................................................................................................................$478
Section 20.877. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures success
located in any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer
than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of
a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$823,175
Section 20.879. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures success
located in a city with more than twenty thousand but fewer than
twenty-three thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.880. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For wastewater improvements and projects for any city with more than
eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants

SCS HCS HB 20 40
and located in a county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$966,143
Section 20.881. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For distribution to any county with more than four hundred thousand but
fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants, for storm water
mitigation and remediation, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$2,500,000
Section 20.882. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants and
that is the county seat of a county with more than thirty-five
thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants, provided that
local matching funds be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$3,159,753
Section 20.883. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, maintenance or construction of a flood wall
located in any city with more than eleven thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one million inhabitants, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$4,000,000

SCS HCS HB 20 41
Section 20.885. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, maintenance or construction of a flood wall
located in any city with more than three hundred forty but fewer
than three hundred eighty-five inhabitants and located in a county
with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand six hundred but fewer than
four thousand two hundred ten inhabitants, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on an 80/20 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 20.886. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For upgrades and maintenance to sewer systems located in any city with
more than ninety-five thousand but fewer than one hundred five
thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$9,769,290
Section 20.887. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-three thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$3,250,000
Section 20.888. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water

SCS HCS HB 20 42
systems and storm water systems for a sewer district that serves
approximately four hundred fifty sanitary sewer customers
located in any county with more than one hundred thousand but
fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than twelve thousand but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants, provided that no local match be
required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$2,875,000
Section 20.889. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than five thousand six
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand
but fewer than five thousand fifty inhabitants, that serves nearly
two thousand customers with six wells and five storage tanks,
provided that no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$406,349
Section 20.890. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than six thousand three hundred but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than two hundred
thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants,
provided that no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.891. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources

SCS HCS HB 20 43
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five
hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$900,000
Section 20.892. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For a learning center serving children with disabilities, including a
childcare program for children with disabilities, located in any
city with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis provided that
such funds shall be matched by the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$3,452,560
Section 20.898. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the renovations of a visual arts performing center located in a city
with more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$250,000
Section 20.900. To the Office of Administration
For administration of programs appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$17,339
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,733,842
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 290,802
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic

SCS HCS HB 20 44
Impacts Fund (2463) ........................................................................................2,041,983
For the Department of Natural Resources administration of programs
appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................4,704
Personal Service ..................................................................................................470,405
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 199,831
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................674,940
For the Department of Economic Development administration of
programs appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................17,082
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,708,218
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 249,641
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ........................................................................................1,974,941
For the Department of Public Safety administration of programs
appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................2,020
Personal Service ..................................................................................................202,022
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 42,022
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 246,064
Total (Not to exceed 42.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,937,928
Section 20.905. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds ...................................................$150,000,000

SCS HCS HB 20 45
Section 20.906. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ..................................................................................$230,000,000
Section 20.910. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For a capital subsidy for eligible transit agencies supporting the
transportation of the elderly, individuals with disabilities, and
low-income individuals
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$6,000,000
Section 20.912. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation and repair of I-35, I-29, and U.S.
169 in Clay, Jackson, and Platte counties, matched by federal
funds
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$30,000,000
Section 20.930. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Plant Industries
For renovations and improvements to the Feed Control Laboratory
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$600,000
Section 20.935. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Weights, Measures and Consumer Protection
For equipment upgrades for the Fuel Quality Laboratory
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$150,000

SCS HCS HB 20 46
Section 20.940. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Weights, Measures and Consumer Protection
For a replacement large scale truck with hoist system
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$300,000
Section 20.955. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For land acquisition and the construction of a new library and research
center at the Missouri University of Science and Technology
campus
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$345,000
Section 20.980. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For Highway Patrol aircraft maintenance and training
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$103,778
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 196,889
Total ..............................................................................................................................$300,667
Section 20.992. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a grant to a nonprofit organization serving multiple counties, at least
one of which is a county with more than one million inhabitants
for the construction of a regional police training facility
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$50,000,000
Section 20.993. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For a construction of natural gas pipeline in a county with more than
sixty thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,000,000
Section 20.994. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety

SCS HCS HB 20 47
For a grant program to upgrade the streetlights in a city with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-three thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than two hundred
thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$300,000
Section 20.997. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For distribution to a county with more than seventeen thousand six
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants, for the planning, design, and construction
of a veterans' memorial, provided that local matching funds must
be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,500,000
Section 20.998. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For capital improvement projects at a museum that commemorates the
life, times, and distinguished career of Sir Winston Churchill, in
a city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of
a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 20.1020. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the purpose of maintenance and repairs at a water treatment plant
located in any city with more than two thousand seven hundred
but fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than five thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$500,000
Section 20.1028. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education

SCS HCS HB 20 48
For the Foundation Formula
For distributions to the free public schools of $4,689,311,449 in total
from this section and Section 2.015 of House Bill No. 2, as truly
agreed to and finally passed by the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session, under the School Foundation Program as
provided in Chapter 163, RSMo, provided that no funds are used
to support the distribution or sharing of any individually
identifiable student data for non-educational purposes, marketing
or advertising, as follows:
For the Foundation Formula, provided that the State Adequacy Target
pursuant to Section 163.011, RSMo, shall not exceed $7,145
Program Distribution
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .........................................................................................................$150,000,000
Section 20.1041. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For an area career center in any city with more than two thousand one
hundred fifty but fewer than two thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than thirty-five
thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 20.1090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, and
construction of infrastructure improvements on Highway 76 in a
city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer than
four thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$6,200,000
Section 20.1121. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources

SCS HCS HB 20 49
For water infrastructure projects in any county with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
thirteen thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$750,000
Section 20.1122. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For a public agency governed by a 12-member appointed board with the
mission to make the St. Louis region a more vibrant place to live,
work and play by developing a regional network of greenways,
provided that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
Section 20.1165. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For distribution to a city with more than seventy-one thousand but fewer
than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants, for the planning, design,
and construction of a children's museum, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 20.1175. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For planning, design, and construction of an arts and cultural center in a
city with more than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than
five thousand six hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand
seven hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
five thousand five hundred but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 20.1178. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For a nonprofit corporation focused on greater downtown community
development in a city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county established by a
membership organization representing business, nonprofit

SCS HCS HB 20 50
organizations, and other investors for the purpose of undertaking
community development projects
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$15,000,000
Section 20.1330. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For distribution to a nonprofit organization operating as a HUD-
approved housing counseling agency, and located in a city with
more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, for the acquisition,
renovation, and construction of a transitional housing campus and
office space for administration and delivery of wrap-around
services
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$500,000
Section 20.1331. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit agency located in a city with more than twelve thousand
five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
located in a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
twelve thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand
inhabitants, that partners with civil, faith and nonprofit
organizations to equip individuals and families with resources
and hope
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$150,000
Section 20.1332. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit agency located in a city with more than twelve thousand
five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
located in a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
twelve thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand
inhabitants, that provides pregnancy testing, resources and
education to make informed decisions
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$150,000

SCS HCS HB 20 51
Section 20.1335. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For distribution to a nonprofit organization focusing on foster and
adoptive care for the purchase, renovation, and construction of a
facility in a city with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than one million inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.1337. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For non-profit organization founded in 1929 to secure strategic
partnerships and financial resources to enhance, strengthen, and
support the educational and leadership opportunities that promote
premier leadership, personal growth and career success for
Missourians in Agricultural Education
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$950,000
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (0.00 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$412,786,684
Federal Funds (106.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................2,232,464,511
Other Funds (0.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................... 11,974,697
Total (106.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$2,657,225,892
